District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-301.22

Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund: loan application and eligibility criteria; vendor payments.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20c
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2602(c), 49 DCR 6968
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6042(b), 51 DCR 8441

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., §  50-322.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 6042(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) reversion of funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund, see § 6042(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 6042(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) reversion of funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund, see § 6042(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Editor's Notes

Section 6042(c) of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “All funds in the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund shall revert to the General Fund on October 1, 2004.”